Utah statutes.
63G-3-603.   Time for contesting a rule -- Statute of limitations.

(1)  A proceeding to contest any rule on the ground of noncompliance with the procedural requirements of this chapter shall commence within two years of the effective date of the rule.

(2)  A proceeding to contest any rule on the ground of not being supported by substantial evidence when viewed in light of the whole administrative record shall commence within four  years of the effective date of the challenged action.

(3)  A proceeding to contest any rule on the basis that a change to the rule made under Subsection 63G-3-402(2) or (3) substantively changed the rule shall be commenced within two years of the date the change was made.

